Wisconsin, session 2025, SB235.
do enact as follows:SB235,11Section 1. 704.96 of the statutes is created to read:SB235,2,42704.96 Campground occupants and guests. (1) This chapter does not 3apply to an occupant, guest, or guest of an occupant or guest of a campground or 4camping resort licensed under s. 97.67.SB235,2,75(2) This section does not affect rights related to individuals in a manufactured 6and mobile home community as defined in s. 66.0435 (1) (cg), or rights related to 7individuals who enter into a campground contract as defined in s. 707.02 (6).SB235,28Section 2. 943.147 of the statutes is created to read:SB235,2,119943.147 Criminal trespass to campground or camping resort. (1) In 10this section, “campground” means a campground or camping resort licensed under 11s. 97.67.SB235,2,1312(2) (a) No person shall enter a campground or remain on campground 13premises without the consent of the operator of the campground.SB235,2,1614(b) A campground operator may provide a written request to a person who has 15entered or remained on the premises of a campground without the consent of the 16campground operator to immediately depart from the campground.SB235,2,2017(c) A person who fails to immediately depart from a campground after he or 18she has received a request under par. (b) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and the 19person may be fined not more than $100 dollars or imprisoned in county jail for not 20more than 30 days, or both.SB235,3,31(3) A law enforcement officer shall arrest and take a person into custody if the 2law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the person has violated 3sub. (2) (c).SB235,34Section 3. 968.07 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB235,3,75968.07 (1m) Notwithstanding sub. (1), a law enforcement officer shall arrest 6a person when required to do so under s. 813.12 (7), 813.122 (10), 813.125 (6), 7813.128 (3g) (b), 943.147 (3), or 968.075 (2) (a) or (5) (e).SB235,3,88